Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Cross references. —

As to construction of fiduciary's rights under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, see §

1-37-105

.

As to fiduciaries generally, see title 4.

Editor's notes. —

Many of the provisions in this title as it appeared before the 1985 revision were originally enacted in the Wyoming Probate Code (Laws 1890-91, ch. 70). Several similar provisions appear in the 1985 revision.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1, revised this title by repealing and recreating former §§

3-1-101

through 3-5-107 as present §§

3-1-101

through

3-5-103

.Sections

3-6-101

through

3-6-119

were unaffected by this act.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1985, ch. 226, has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be useful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 3, provides: “This act shall govern all proceedings commenced after the effective date of this act. It shall also govern further proceedings in cases pending on the effective date hereof unless the court determines such application is not feasible or shall work an injustice, in which event the former procedures shall apply.”

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 4, makes the act effective on July 1, 1985.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Child Custody Arrangements: Say What You Mean, Mean What You Say,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Guardian and Ward § 1 et seq.

39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward § 1 et seq.